Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 14
AUTHORITY OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT
TO ENACT MINIMUM WAGE

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1210, see section 1 of chapter 320, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

29-1-1401. Authority of a local government to enact minimum wage laws - definition.

A local government may enact a law establishing a minimum wage for individuals performing work while physically within the local government's jurisdiction in accordance with section 8-6-101.

As used in this section, "local government" means a:

City;

Home rule city;

Town;

Territorial charter city;

City and county;

County; or

Home rule county.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (HB 19-1210), ch. 320, p. 2971, § 2, effective January 1, 2020.